Utah statutes.
63G-12-211.   Prohibited conduct -- Administrative penalties -- Criminal penalties.

(1)  A permit holder may not file for or receive unemployment benefits.

(2)  A person may not:

(a)  furnish false or forged information or documentation in support of an application;

(b)  alter the information on a permit;

(c)  if the person is a guest worker, be reported absent from work for 10 consecutive days without the approval of the person who hires the guest worker;

(d)  allow an individual to use a permit if the individual is not entitled to use the permit;

(e)  display or represent that a permit is issued to an individual, if the permit is not issued to the individual;

(f)  display a revoked permit as a valid permit;

(g)  knowingly or with reckless disregard acquire, use, display, or transfer an item that purports to be a valid permit, but that is not a valid permit; or

(h)  otherwise violate this part.

(3)  For a violation described in Subsections (1) and (2), the department may:

(a)  suspend, limit, or revoke and repossess a permit;

(b)  impose a civil penalty not to exceed $750 for each violation; or

(c)  take a combination of actions under this section.

(4)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person:

(a)  furnishes false or forged information or documentation in support of an application; or

(b)  alters the information on a permit.



Enacted by Chapter 18, 2011 General Session

